test/src/gt-desc-yamls/classiinouns_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - jolom - ok : # test for possessive forms of noun jolom
    jolom+N+Sg: jolom
    jolom+N+Pl: jolomeb'
    jolom+N+Sg+SetA.Sg1: injolom
    jolom+N+SetA.Sg1+Pl: injolomeb'
    jolom+N+Sg+SetA.Sg2: aajolom
    jolom+N+SetA.Sg2+Pl: aajolomeb'
    jolom+N+Sg+SetA.Sg3: xjolom
    jolom+N+SetA.Sg3+Pl: xjolomeb'
    jolom+N+Sg+SetA.Pl1: qajolom
    jolom+N+SetA.Pl1+Pl: qajolomeb'
    jolom+N+Sg+SetA.Pl2: eejolom
    jolom+N+SetA.Pl2+Pl: eejolomeb'
    jolom+N+Sg+Art+Def+SetA.Sg1: linjolom
    jolom+N+Art+Def+SetA.Sg1+Pl: linjolomeb'
    jolom+N+Sg+Art+Def+SetA.Sg2: laajolom
    jolom+N+Art+Def+SetA.Sg2+Pl: laajolomeb'
    jolom+N+Sg+Art+Def+SetA.Pl2: leejolom
    jolom+N+Art+Def+SetA.Pl2+Pl: leejolomeb'
    
